en: Rum and raisins ice cream tubs
es: Tarrinas y bloques de helado de ron con pasas, Tarrinas de helado de ron con pasas, Bloques de helado de ron con pasas
fr: Glaces rhum-raisin, glaces au rhum et aux raisins
hr: Kadice sladoleda od ruma i grožđica
lt: Romo ir razinų ledai indeliuose
nl: Rum-rozijnenroomijs, Malaga-roomijs

en: Vanilla and macadamia ice cream tubs
es: helado de vainilla y macadamia
fr: Glaces à la vanille et macadamia

en: Vanilla and pecan ice cream tubs, Pecan nut ice cream tubs
fr: Glaces à la vanille et pécan, Glaces aux noix de pécan, Crèmes glacées à la noix de pécan

en: Stracciatella ice cream tubs
es: helado de stracciatella
fr: Glaces à la stracciatella
hr: Kadice za sladoled stracciatella

fr: Glaces au caramel
de: Eiskrem Karamell, Speiseeis mit Karamell, Karamelleiskrem

en: Walnut ice cream tubs
fr: Glaces aux noix

en: Hazelnut ice cream tubs
fr: Glaces aux noisettes

en: Berries ice cream tubs, Berry ice cream tubs
de: Eiskrem mit roten Früchten, Speiseeis mit roten Früchten
fr: Glaces aux fruits rouges
hr: Bobice sladoled kadice
sv: Bärgräddglassbyttor

fr: Glaces aux amandes
de: Eiskrem mit Mandeln, Speiseeis mit Mandeln

en: Mint ice cream tubs
fr: Glaces à la menthe

en: Lemon ice cream tubs
fr: Glaces au citron

en: White chocolate ice cream tubs
fr: Glaces au chocolat blanc

en: Ice cream sandwiches
de: Eiskrem-Sandwiche, Sandwicheis, Eiskremschnitten
es: Sándwiches de helado
fi: Jäätelökeksit, Keksijäätelöt, Jäätelösandwich
fr: Sandwichs à la crème glacée, Sandwiches à la crème glacée
he: קסאטה, קסטה, קסטות, קסאטות
hr: Sladoledni sendviči
it: Biscotto gelato
lt: Ledų sumuštiniai
nl: Roomijswafels
sv: Glasssandwichar

en: Sorbets
bg: Сорбе
da: Sorbeter
de: Fruchteise
es: Sorbetes
fi: sorbetit
fr: Sorbets
he: סורבה
hr: Sorbeti
it: Sorbetto
ja: ソルベ, シャーベット
lt: Šerbetai
nl: Sorbets
pl: Sorbet, sorbety
ru: Сорбеты
sv: Sorbeter

en: Sorbet tub, Sorbet in box
fr: Sorbet en bac
hr: Sorbet kada
lt: Šerbetai indeliuse, šerbetai dėžutėse
sv: Sorbetbyttor, Sorbetglassbyttor

en: Sorbets on stick
fr: Sorbets en bâtonnet
hr: Sorbeti na štapiću
lt: Šerbetai and pagaliuko

en: Orange sorbets, Frosted orange sorbets
da: Appelsinsorbeter
es: Sorbetes de naranja
fr: Sorbets à l’orange, Sorbets à l'orange givrée
hr: Sorbeti od naranče
it: Sorbetto all'arancia
lt: Apelsinų šerbetai
nl: Sinaasappelsorbets

en: Mandarin sorbets
de: Mandarinen-Sorbets
es: Sorbetes de mandarina
fi: Mandariinisorbetit
fr: Sorbets à la mandarine
hr: Sorbeti od mandarina
it: Sorbetto al mandarino
lt: Mandarinų šerbetai
nl: Mandarijnsorbets

en: Strawberry sorbets
da: Jordbærsorbeter
es: Sorbetes de fresa
fi: mansikkasorbetit
fr: Sorbets à la fraise
hr: Sorbeti od jagoda
it: Sorbetto alla fragola
lt: Braškiniai šerbetai
nl: Aardbeiensorbets
sv: Jordgubbsorbeter

en: Raspberry sorbets
da: Hindbærsorbeter
de: Himbeer Sorbets
es: Sorbetes de frambuesa
fi: vadelmasorbetit
fr: Sorbets à la framboise
hr: Sorbeti od malina
it: Sorbetto al lampone
lt: Avietiniai šerbetai
nl: Frambozensorbets
sv: Hallonsorbeter